Tennessee, session 114, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Ola Mae Ransom
Reintegration Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-723, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a fee for a business license must not
be charged to any veteran of the United States military, including the national guard and
reserves.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1108
002599
- 1 -